Utah statutes.
20A-2-107.5.   Designating or changing party affiliation -- Regular primary
election and Western States Presidential Primary.
(1)  At any regular primary election or the Western States Presidential
Primary:
(a)  each county clerk shall provide change of party affiliation forms to the
poll workers for each voting precinct within the county; and
(b)  any registered voter who is classified as "unaffiliated" may affiliate
with a political party by completing the form and giving it to the poll
worker.
(2)  An unaffiliated voter who affiliates with a political party as provided
in Subsection (1)(b) may vote in that party's primary election.
